Montana, session 2025, SB116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 22-3-1002, MCA, is amended to read:
"22-3-1002. Montana heritage preservation and development commission. (1) There is a
Montana heritage preservation and development commission. The commission is attached to the department of
commerce for administrative purposes only, pursuant to 2-15-121. The commission and the department shall
negotiate a specific indirect administrative rate annually. The rate determined by the commission and the
department must be reported to the economic affairs interim committee in accordance with 5-11-210.
(2) (a) The commission consists of 14 14 members. The members shall must broadly represent
the state. Nine Nine members must be appointed by the governor, one member one member must be
appointed by the president of the senate, and one member one member must be appointed by the speaker of
the house.
(b) If the president of the senate and the speaker of the house do not appoint the members for
which they are responsible within 6 2 months of a vacancy having occurred in those positions, the members
must be appointed by the governor.
(c) The director of the Montana historical society, the director of the department of fish, wildlife,
and parks, and the director of the department of commerce shall serve as members.
(d) Of the members appointed by the governor When appointing a member under subsection
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 116
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 116
(2)(a), the governor, the president of the senate, and the speaker of the house shall prioritize selection based
on whether the member:
(i) one member must have extensive has experience in managing facilities that cater to the needs
of tourists;
(ii) one member must have has experience in community planning;
(iii) one member must have has experience in historic preservation;
(iv) two members must have has broad experience in business;
(v) one member must be is a member of the tourism advisory council established in 2-15-1816;
(vi) one member must be is a Montana historian; and or
(vii) two members must be is from the public at large.
(3) Except for the initial appointments, members appointed by the governor under subsection
(2)(a) shall serve 3-year terms. Members appointed by the president of the senate and the speaker of the
house or by the governor under subsection (2)(b) shall serve 2-year terms. If a vacancy occurs, the appointing
authority shall make an appointment for the unexpired portion of the term.
(4) (a) The commission may employ:
(i) an executive director who has general responsibility for the selection and management of
commission staff, developing recommendations for the purchase of property, and overseeing the management
of acquired property;
(ii) a curator who is responsible for the display and preservation of the acquired property; and
(iii) other staff that the commission and the executive director determine are necessary to manage
and operate commission properties.
(b) The commission shall prescribe the duties and annual salary of the executive director, the
curator, and other commission staff.
(4) In compliance with the state pay plan, the department shall provide all staff and services to the
commission that the commission, in conjunction with the department, determines are necessary for carrying out
the commission's programs and statutory requirements. The department shall assess the commission for
reasonable costs."
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 116
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 116
Section 2. Transition. The reduction of the number of Montana heritage preservation and
development commission members from 14 to 9 as provided in [section 1(2)(a)] must occur as the terms of the
existing members appointed by the governor end and the members are not reappointed.
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 116
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 116, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 116
INTRODUCED BY T. TEZAK, B. USHER
AN ACT REVISING THE MONTANA HERITAGE PRESERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT COMMISSION;
REVISING THE QUALIFICATION AND NUMBER QUALIFICATIONS OF THE MEMBERS OF THE
COMMISSION; REVISING THE ADMINISTRATIVE REQUIREMENTS AND PROCESSES BETWEEN THE
COMMISSION AND THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE; AMENDING SECTION 22-3-1002, MCA; AND
PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE.”